Massachusetts, session 194th, H2825.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 64 of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking, in line 31, the words “independent contractors” 
and inserting in place thereof the following:- contracted employees 
SECTION 2. Said section 64 of said chapter 29 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
hereby further amended by inserting at the end thereof the following paragraph:- 
The state treasurer, on behalf of the commonwealth, may establish an automatic 
enrollment feature within the deferred compensation program. The automatic enrollment feature 
shall not require prior authorization by an employee, and is hereby deemed to be an exception to 
the provisions of the Massachusetts Wage Act or any other state law requiring employee 
authorization for a payroll deduction or any similar ordinance of a governmental body. The 
details of the automatic enrollment feature shall be set forth in the deferred compensation plan 
document and shall include, but not be limited to, the following provisions: 

of 4 13  (a) automatic enrollment shall apply only to new employees of the commonwealth, 
meaning employees hired on or after June 1, 2024; provided, however, that for any 
commonwealth agencies or departments that purchase or make payments to an individual or 
group annuity contract, custodial account, or any other investment authorized under section 
403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code for its employees, automatic enrollment shall only apply at 
said agency’s or department’s discretion and affirmative election; 
(b) automatic enrollment shall apply only to new employees of a “governmental body”, 
as defined in section 64B of chapter 29 of these general laws, if the governmental body elects to 
implement the automatic enrollment feature for its employees; 
(c) automatic enrollment may not require more than the IRS safe harbor maximum 
deferral percentage; 
(d) the amount of compensation deferred by an automatically-enrolled employee shall 
automatically increase by a specified amount each year unless the participating employee elects 
not to participate in auto escalation or elects to defer a different amount than specified; 
(e) an employee who is automatically enrolled shall no more than ninety days to 
discontinue participation in the plan; 
(f) an automatically-enrolled employee who discontinues participation in the plan within 
ninety days shall receive a refund of their account as soon as practicable after discontinuing 
participation; 

of 4 32  (g) a qualified default investment option to receive contributions by any automatically-
enrolled employee who does not choose an investment alternative to receive the employee’s 
contributions; and 
(h) notice requirements to automatically-enrolled participants in accordance with the 
Internal Revenue Code and applicable IRS Rulings. 
SECTION 3. Section 64B of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting between the third and fourth paragraphs the following new paragraph:- 
The treasurer or, in the absence of the treasurer, the chief financial officer by whatever 
name that person is called, on behalf of a governmental body, may, at its own election, 
implement an automatic enrollment feature within its deferred compensation program established 
pursuant to this section 64B, chapter 29. The automatic enrollment feature shall not require 
advance authorization by an employee and is hereby deemed to be an exception to the provisions 
of the Massachusetts Wage Act or any other state law requiring employee authorization 
for a payroll deduction or any similar ordinance of a governmental body. Subject to the election 
of each governmental body, any such auto enrollment feature permitted as a part of a 
governmental body’s deferred compensation program shall only apply to new employees of a 
governmental body hired on or after June 1, 2024 and such deferred compensation program will 
be required to include the specifications for auto enrollment detailed in subsections (b) through 
(h), inclusively, of section 64 of chapter 29 of said General Laws. 
SECTION 4. Section 64E of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking, in lines 5 and 6, the words “and employing not 
more than 20 persons,” 

of 4 54  SECTION 5. Said section 64E of said chapter 29, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting at the end thereof the following subsection:- 
(g) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the state treasurer, or 
designee, may seek to reduce operating expenses for the plan through private donations or grants, 
which may include direct and indirect fundraising.